Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-104.03
Power to provide facilities, programs, and services; need for advocacy or protective services.

Each county shall have the authority to:

(1) Plan, initiate, fund, maintain, administer, and evaluate facilities, programs, and services that advocate for or meet the rehabilitation, treatment, care, training, educational, residential, diagnostic, evaluation, community supervision, and protective service needs of the following individuals domiciled in the county:

(a) Any person who is dependent, aged, blind, disabled, ill, or infirm;

(b) Any person with a mental disorder;

(c) Any person with an intellectual disability; or

(d) Any person who is a survivor of domestic violence or sexual assault;

(2) Purchase outright by installment contract or by mortgage with the power to borrow funds in connection with such contract or mortgage, hold, sell, and lease for a period of more than one year real estate necessary for use of the county to plan, initiate, fund, maintain, administer, and evaluate such facilities, programs, and services;

(3) Lease personal property necessary for such facilities, programs, and services. Any such lease may provide for installment payments that extend over a period of more than one year, notwithstanding the provisions of section 23-132 or 23-916;

(4) Enter into agreements with other counties, state agencies, other political subdivisions, and private nonprofit organizations to plan, initiate, fund, maintain, administer, and evaluate such facilities, programs, and services. Any agreement with any public agency pursuant to this subdivision is subject to the Interlocal Cooperation Act; and

(5) Contract for such services from public or private entities that provide such services on a vendor basis.

Laws 1971, LB 599, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1266, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 393, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB940, § 4.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.